Rhode Island statutes. Title 13 Criminals — Correctional Institutions
Chapter 8 Parole
13-8-18.1.
Preliminary parole violation hearing.

As soon as is practicable after a detention for an alleged violation of parole, the parole board shall afford the alleged parole violator a preliminary parole revocation hearing before a hearing officer designated by the board. The hearing officer shall not have had any prior supervisory involvement over the alleged violator.

The alleged violator shall, within five (5) days of the detention, in Rhode Island be given written notice of the time, place, and purpose of the preliminary hearing. The notice shall state the specific conditions of parole that are alleged to have been violated and in what manner. The notice shall also inform the alleged violator of the following rights in connection with the preliminary hearing:

The right to appear and speak in his or her own behalf;

The right to call witnesses and present evidence;

The right to confront and cross-examine the witnesses against him or her, unless the hearing officer finds on the record that a witness may be subjected to risk of harm if his or her identity is revealed; and

The right to retain counsel and, if unable to afford counsel, the right under certain circumstances to the appointment of counsel for the preliminary hearing.

The determination of whether or not the alleged violator is entitled to appointed counsel, if such a request is made, shall be made on the record and in accordance with all relevant statutory and constitutional provisions.

The notice form must explain in clear and unambiguous language the procedures established by the parole board concerning an alleged violator’s exercise of the rights denominated in subsection (b), including the mechanism for compelling the attendance of witnesses; the mechanism for obtaining documentary evidence; and the mechanism for requesting the appointment of counsel.

The preliminary hearing shall take place no later than ten (10) days after service of notice set forth in subsection (b). A preliminary hearing may be postponed beyond the ten-day (10) time limit for good cause at the request of either party, but may not be postponed at the request of the state for more than five (5) additional days. The parole revocation charges shall be dismissed with prejudice if a preliminary hearing is not conducted within the time period established by this paragraph, not including any delay directly attributed to a postponement requested by the alleged violator.

If the alleged violator has requested the appointment of counsel at least five (5) days prior to the preliminary hearing, the preliminary hearing may not proceed without counsel present unless the hearing officer finds on the record, in accordance with all relevant statutory and constitutional provisions, that the alleged violator is not entitled to appointed counsel. If the alleged violator is found to have been entitled to counsel and no such counsel has been appointed, the parole violation charges must be dismissed with prejudice. If the request for counsel was made four (4) or fewer days in advance of the preliminary hearing, the time limit within which the preliminary hearing must be held may be extended up to five (5) additional days.

The standard of proof at the preliminary hearing shall be probable cause to believe that the alleged violator has violated one or more conditions of his or her parole and that the violation or violations were not de minimus in nature. Proof of conviction of a crime committed subsequent to release on parole shall constitute probable cause for the purposes of the preliminary hearing.

At the preliminary hearing, the hearing officer shall review the violation charges with the alleged violator; direct the presentation of the evidence concerning the alleged violation; receive the statements of the witnesses and documentary evidence; and allow cross-examination of those witnesses in attendance. All proceedings shall be recorded and preserved.

At the conclusion of the preliminary hearing, the hearing officer shall inform the alleged violator of his or her decision as to whether there is probable cause to believe that the alleged violator has violated one or more conditions of his or her parole and, if so, whether the violation or violations were de minimus in nature. Those determinations shall be based solely on the evidence adduced at the preliminary hearing. The hearing officer shall state in writing the reasons for his or her determinations and the evidence relied upon for those determinations. A copy of the written findings shall be sent to the alleged violator, and his or her counsel if applicable, within fourteen (14) days of the preliminary hearing.

If the hearing officer finds that there is no probable cause to believe that the alleged violator has violated one or more conditions of his or her parole or that the violation or violations, if any, were de minimus in nature, the parole chairperson shall rescind the detention warrant and direct that the alleged violator, unless in custody for other reasons, be released and restored to parole supervision.

If the hearing officer finds that there is probable cause to believe that the alleged violator has violated one or more conditions of his or her parole and that the violation or violations were not de minimus in nature, the alleged violator shall be held for a final parole revocation hearing. A final parole revocation hearing must be held as soon as is practicable, but in no event more than ninety (90) days after the conclusion of the preliminary hearing.

An alleged violator may waive his or her right to a preliminary hearing. The waiver must be in written form. In the event of such a written waiver, a final parole revocation hearing must be held as soon as is practicable, but in no event more than ninety (90) days after the right to a preliminary hearing is waived. Notwithstanding the above, a final parole revocation hearing may be continued by the alleged violator beyond the ninety-day (90) time period. For parole violations not involving a new criminal offense, an alleged violator may waive his or her right to a final parole revocation hearing, where there is no dispute as to the alleged violation and the parolee charged with the violation(s) freely admits to the violation and accepts the appropriate sanction imposed by the parole board.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 209, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 369, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 162, art. 13, § 3, effective July 6, 2021.

13-8-19.
Arrest and return to institution on revocation of parole.

Whenever the permit of a prisoner is revoked, in accordance with the provisions of §

13-8-18.1

the parole board shall order the prisoner to be returned to the adult correctional institutions or to the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions, as the case may be, to serve the remainder of the prisoner’s original sentence according to the terms of that sentence.

The time between the release of the prisoner under the permit and the prisoner’s return to the adult correctional institutions or the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions under order of the board may be considered as any part of the prisoner’s original sentence. The parole board may choose to credit or revoke all or part of the time while released under the permit from the original sentence, taking into consideration the seriousness of the violation that prompted revocation. The board shall adopt standards to be utilized in determining whether to credit all or part of the time served under the permit from the original sentence.

If a prisoner is at liberty when the prisoner’s permit is revoked, the chairperson shall issue his or her warrant to any officer authorized to serve criminal process to arrest the prisoner and return the prisoner to the adult correctional institutions or the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions in accordance with the provisions of §

13-8-18.1

as ordered by the board.

Where the prisoner is supervised by the parole board pursuant to a grant of parole by a state or jurisdiction other than Rhode Island, the parole board shall issue a detention warrant and order the prisoner committed to the adult correctional institution or the women’s division of the adult correctional institution until the authority from the state or other jurisdiction having granted the prisoner parole takes custody of the prisoner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3129, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-19

; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 5; P.L. 2003, ch. 209, § 2; P.L. 2003, ch. 369, § 2; P.L. 2013, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 111, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 346, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 352, § 1.

13-8-20.
Service of original sentence by parolee committing offense while on parole.

If a prisoner, at the time the prisoner’s permit is revoked, is confined in any penal institution on any criminal process or under sentence for any offense committed while the prisoner was at liberty upon parole, the order of the parole board for the prisoner’s return to the adult correctional institutions or the women’s division of the adult correctional institutions, to serve the remainder of the prisoner’s original sentence, shall be served upon the release of the prisoner from the penal institution in which the prisoner is confined, and it shall be discretionary with the board as to whether or not the remainder of the prisoner’s original sentence runs concurrently with or consecutively to any other sentence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 5; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3129, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-20

; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 5.

13-8-21.
Signature and sealing of instruments — Recognition by officers.

All permits and orders of the parole board issued under the authority of this chapter shall be signed by the chairperson and one other member of the board. The board shall have a seal which shall be affixed to all permits and orders issued by it, and to all warrants issued by the chairperson, under the authority of this chapter. All permits and orders of the board so signed and sealed, and all warrants issued by the chairperson under the authority of this chapter, shall be recognized by all sheriffs and their deputies, all officers authorized to serve criminal process, the police officers of the several cities and towns, and by the director of the department of corrections, or his or her designee, and by the keeper of any other place where prisoners are confined or detained in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 7; 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-21

; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 5.

13-8-22.
Manner of obtaining information by parole board.

The parole board, in the discharge of its duties under this chapter, shall not be required to receive or consider any petition, and it may secure the information upon which it exercises its authority, or upon which it makes its findings in any case, in any manner and by any means that it may consider most fitting to carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, it shall be the duty of the clerks of courts, the sheriffs and their deputies, the police officers of cities and towns, the probation officers, the officers of the adult correctional institutions, and every person having charge of any other place where prisoners are confined or detained, to furnish to the board and to any member of the board, whenever requested by the board or by any member of it, any and all information they may have relating to the character and history of any prisoner whose sentence is placed under the control of the board by this chapter. In the case of prisoners transferred to federal institutions under the provisions of §

13-12-1

, the board may, in its discretion, arrange to obtain information concerning those prisoners from the appropriate officials of the United States Bureau of Prisons. That information shall include, but not be limited to, testimony of the prisoner being considered for parole, and official records and reports, including recommendations concerning the prisoners. The board is authorized to request of the contracting authority the inclusion of provisions for obtaining that information in contracts made pursuant to §

13-12-1

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, §§ 7, 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 7; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-22

; P.L. 1970, ch. 117, § 1.

13-8-23.
Parties required to provide reports to parole board.

Information concerning applicants for parole shall be provided by:

The director of corrections, who shall submit a list of all prisoners under his or her control who will be eligible for parole in a given month, not later than the tenth day of the second month preceding. That list shall identify the prisoner by name, offense, and date of commitment;

The director of corrections, who shall secure reports from prison officials and institutional personnel who have had direct contact with the prisoner including, but not limited to, prison administrators, the classification board, mental health counselors, correctional officers, and medical personnel. The director shall transmit those reports, together with all pertinent classification information, including social history and information pertaining to the prisoner’s disciplinary record, participation in rehabilitation and educational programs, employment history and plan, housing plan, community supports, mental health status and needs, substance abuse status and needs, discharge plan, and any actions or recommendations made by a classification board or committee in the institution, to the board not later than the twentieth day of the month next preceding the month in which the individual is eligible to appear before the board;

The attorney general’s department, which shall supply to the board a written report of its recommendation concerning the current application for parole. The report shall set forth in detail the reason or reasons why the particular inmate, given his or her criminal history and the circumstances surrounding his or her offense, should or should not be paroled. The department shall also consult the trial judge in the case to determine if he or she may wish to make any comment or recommendation; and if requested by the board, the department shall have one of its attorneys present at the board hearings to elaborate on the attorney general’s recommendation as to parole of the inmate;

When deemed necessary by the board, a psychiatrist, who shall examine the prisoner upon notice from the board and shall submit his or her findings and recommendations to the board not later than the twentieth day of the month next preceding the month in which the prisoner is eligible to appear before the board;

Licensed mental health professionals who shall upon notice from the board examine the prisoner and report their findings and recommendations to the board not later than the twentieth day of the month next preceding the month in which the prisoner is eligible to appear before the board;

The department of corrections, which shall submit: (i) a transcript of the previous criminal record of the prisoner, including the date of offenses, nature of offenses, and the disposition of each; (ii) a copy of the pre-sentence investigation; and (iii) a full summary of the contact of the department with the prisoner during any prior period under supervision, either probation or parole or both. The department shall make a written recommendation concerning the current application for parole.

History of Section.

G.L., ch. 617, § 8; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2724, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1956, ch. 3721, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-23

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9; P.L. 1976, ch. 290, § 5; P.L. 1989, ch. 419, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 151, art. 20, § 2.

13-8-24.
Case reports to director of corrections.

The parole board shall prepare a report for each application approved, denied, or continued, containing: (1) a summary of the facts and considerations on which the decision was based; (2) the majority decision of the board, including any special conditions to be required of the parolee; and (3) the dissent, if any, and the reasons for that dissent; and signed by the members of the board. Copies of those reports shall be sent to the director of corrections.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 9; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-24

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9.

13-8-25.
Annual reports of board.

The parole board shall annually report its activities during each fiscal year to the director of corrections, and this shall be incorporated in a report to the governor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 9; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-25

; Reorg. Plan No. 1, 1970; P.L. 1972, ch. 163, § 9.

13-8-26.
Statements by interested individuals or families.

All individuals, members of the family, friends, legal counsel, agencies, or other interested persons desiring to make a statement with respect to a particular applicant for parole, shall submit it in writing for inclusion in the applicant’s folder, as provided in §

13-8-6

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 10; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-26

.

13-8-27.
Fees and allowances of officers.

Every officer rendering any service, by order of the parole board or the chairperson, under this chapter shall be paid any fees and allowances that are authorized by law to be paid for like service in a criminal case, and the state controller is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders on the general treasurer for payment out of the appropriation for the payment of officers’ fees in criminal cases, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers duly authenticated and approved by the chairperson.

History of Section.

P.L. 1915, ch. 1186, § 9; G.L. 1923, ch. 414, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 9; P.L. 1946, ch. 1687, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 617, § 13; P.L. 1949, ch. 2161, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-27

.

13-8-28.
[Obsolete.]

13-8-29.
Authority of parole board to grant parole to federal prisoners.

The board may have in its discretion the power to consider an application for parole from a prisoner confined to a federal institution pursuant to chapter 12 of title 13, and to act on that application while the prisoner is still detained in the institution; provided, that the board obtain information concerning the prisoner in compliance with §

13-8-22

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 117, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

13-8-29

.

13-8-30.
Community supervision for child molestation offenses.

Notwithstanding any other provision of the general laws to the contrary, any person convicted of first degree child molestation pursuant to §

11-37-8.1

or second degree child molestation pursuant to §

11-37-8.3

shall, in addition to any other penalty imposed, be subject to community supervision upon that person’s completion of any prison sentence, suspended sentence, and/or probationary term imposed as a result of that conviction.

In the case of a person convicted of first degree child molestation pursuant to §

11-37-8.1

, community supervision shall be for life and pursuant to the provisions of §

11-37-8.2.1

, community supervision shall include electronic monitoring via an active global positioning system for life. In the case of a person eighteen (18) years or older convicted of second degree child molestation pursuant to §

11-37-8.3

, the term of the original sentence imposed and the term of community supervision shall not exceed thirty (30) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 5.

13-8-31.
Community supervision board.

There shall be established a community supervision board which shall be comprised of the parole board.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 375, § 1.

13-8-32.
Community supervision.

Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person who has been placed on community supervision shall be subject to the provisions of law governing parole as if the person were a parolee. The parole board shall impose terms and conditions for the sentence within thirty (30) days of sentencing. The terms and conditions may be revised, altered, and amended by the parole board at any time.

A person under community supervision shall be under the jurisdiction, supervision and control of the parole board in the same manner as a person under parole supervision. The board is authorized on an individual basis to establish any conditions of community supervision that may be necessary to ensure public safety, which may include protecting the public from a person committing a sex offense including child molestation or child kidnapping as well as promoting the rehabilitation of the person. The conditions shall include at the expense of the offender sex offender treatment with a recognized treatment provider in the field to be determined by the board for as long as the board deems necessary, and compliance with the requirements of chapter 37 of title 11.

The board is authorized to impose and enforce a supervision fee, and rehabilitation fee upon a person on community supervision. To the extent possible the board shall set the fee in an amount that will substantially defray the cost of the community supervision program.

The board shall also establish a fee waiver procedure for hardship cases and indigency.

After a person sentenced to community supervision has been under supervision for a period of fifteen (15) years or any time after the person ceases to be a resident of the state, the person may petition the board for termination of community supervision. A petition for termination which is based upon the person no longer being a resident of Rhode Island shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the person attesting to his or her non-residency and providing his or her new out of state address. A petition for termination which is based upon the completion of fifteen (15) years of community supervision may only occur by a majority vote of all the members of the community supervision board. Termination may only occur by a majority vote of all the members. Upon receiving a petition for termination, the board shall, within sixty (60) days, conduct a hearing before the full membership. At least thirty (30) days prior to a hearing on the petition, the board shall cause a criminal history check to be conducted, and notify in writing the victims of the crime for which the sentence was imposed, the attorney general, and the chief of police or head of the organized police department of the municipality in which the crime was committed, and the chief of police or head of the organized police department of the municipality in which the person resides, of the person’s petition for release from community supervision. Those officials and victims shall be provided the opportunity to respond to the petition. The officials and victims may appear in person or be represented or make written recommendations to the board, but failure of any or all of the officials to appear or make recommendations shall not delay the termination procedure.

If a victim is deceased at the time the termination hearing is scheduled the deceased victim may be represented by his relatives in the following order: mother, father, spouse, child, grandchild, brother or sister, niece or nephew.

Prior to the hearing, the petitioner shall be examined, personally interviewed and evaluated by a psychiatrist or licensed psychologist, who is an expert in the field of sex offender treatment and approved by the board. The psychiatrist or psychologist shall file written reports with the board of his or her examinations and diagnoses, and his or her recommendation for the disposition of the person. The petitioner’s treatment while on community supervision shall be examined and considered by the psychiatrist or psychologist in the recommendation. The reports shall be admissible in a hearing pursuant to this section. If the person refuses, without good cause, to be personally interviewed by the psychiatrist or psychologist, the person shall be deemed to have waived his or her right to a hearing on the petition, and the petition shall be dismissed by the board. The cost of the examination and evaluation shall be the responsibility of the person petitioning for release from supervision; provided, that procedures shall be established for cases of hardship or indigency.

At the hearing, the board shall call any witnesses that it deems necessary, including the examining psychiatrist or psychologist, the attorney general, the police chief or the victims of the crime or his or her family member, as the board deems necessary. The petitioner may offer any witnesses and other proof at the hearing that is relevant to the petition.

The board shall terminate community supervision if the petitioner demonstrates, by clear and convincing evidence, that he or she has not committed a sex offense of child kidnapping since his or her conviction, that he or she is not likely to pose a threat to the safety of others, and that the public interest is not served by further community supervision.

If a petition for release from supervision is denied by the board, the person may not file another petition for a period of three (3) years.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 375, § 1; P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 5; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 5.

13-8-33.
Violations of community supervision — penalties.

Any person who violates a condition of community supervision shall be guilty of a separate offense and, upon conviction, shall be sentenced to no more than one year in prison; provided, if the violation also constitutes a criminal offense the term of imprisonment shall be consecutive to any sentence received for the commission of the new offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1998, ch. 375, § 1.

13-8-34.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid or unconstitutional, the invalidity or unconstitutionality shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter which can be given effect without the invalid or unconstitutional provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 2006, ch. 206, § 6; P.L. 2006, ch. 207, § 6.

13-8-35.
Early termination of parole supervision.

Upon its own motion or upon request of a parolee, the parole board may terminate a parolee’s supervision before the sentence expires.

Seven (7) years after releasing a prisoner on supervision, and at least annually thereafter, the parole board shall review the status of the parolee to determine the need for continued supervision. The parole board shall also conduct a status review whenever the supervision officer recommends early termination of the parolee’s supervision.

Seven (7) years after releasing a prisoner on supervision, excluding a parolee serving a life sentence for first- or second-degree murder, the parole board shall terminate supervision over the parolee unless the parole board determines, after a hearing in accordance with this chapter, that the supervision should not be terminated because there is a likelihood that the parolee will engage in conduct violating any criminal law. If the parole board does not terminate supervision under this subsection, the parolee may request a hearing annually thereafter, and the parole board shall conduct an early termination hearing at least every two (2) years.

In calculating the two-year (2) and seven-year (7) periods provided in this section, the parole board shall not include any period of parole before the recent release, or any period served in confinement or any other sentence.

A parolee may not appeal an adverse decision under this section.

The parole board shall promulgate guidelines that effectuate the purpose of this section, which is to provide a mechanism for eliminating supervision on parole, in deserving cases, consistent with the rehabilitative and reentry needs of the parolee and the promotion of public safety.

In determining whether to grant early termination from supervision, the parole board shall consider its guidelines and promulgate new guidelines so as to effectuate the purpose of this section, which is to provide a mechanism for eliminating supervision on parole, in deserving cases, consistent with the rehabilitative and reentry needs of the parolee and the promotion of public safety. Termination of supervision is indicated if the parolee:

Has been on supervised parole for the required period;

Has observed all the laws within and without the state;

Has been employed and remains employed at the time of the request; and

Has completed seven (7) continuous years of supervision and is free from an incident of new criminal behavior or serious parole violation.

As used in this section, the term an “incident of new criminal behavior” or “serious parole violation” includes a new arrest or report of a parole violation, if supported by substantial evidence of guilt, even if no conviction or parole revocation results. The parole board shall not terminate supervision until it determines the disposition of a pending criminal charge.

Case-specific factors that may justify a departure either above or below the early termination may relate to the current behavior of the parolee, or the parolee’s background and criminal history.

History of Section.

P.L. 2021, ch. 375, § 1, effective July 13, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 376, § 1, effective July 13, 2021.